Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6224 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Under any method of compensation, the total commission payable
to a public insurance adjuster, including expenses, direct costs, or
any other costs accrued by the public insurance adjuster, shall not
exceed ten percent (10%) of the amount of the insurance settlement
when adjusting for entities subject to The Governmental Tort Claims
Act, Section 151 et seq. of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1501 Page 2

ENR. H. B. NO. 1501 Page 3